Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
CHAPTER 1 General Provisions

Law reviews.

For article, “Whistleblowing in the Compliance Era,” see 55 Ga. L. Rev. 147 (2020).

For article, “HB 286: Restricting Local and Municipal Governments’ Ability to Reduce Police Department Funding,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 201 (2021).

45-1-1.
Employees of state hospitals and certain state institutions authorized to make purchases of goods and services; limitations.

Except as provided in Code Sections 45-10-20 through 45-10-25, employees of hospitals, educational institutions, eleemosynary institutions, penal institutions, and correctional institutions which are under the control and jurisdiction of a state department or the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia shall be entitled to obtain goods and services in the same manner and under the same procedure used in obtaining such goods and services through such hospitals and institutions and the laws of this state relating to purchasing contrary thereto shall not apply to such employees; provided, however, that no employee shall be permitted to make any single purchase of goods or services in excess of $50.00, except medical and dental services only; and in no event shall any employee obtain goods or services for any person except for himself or members of his immediate family.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 383, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45.

45-1-2.
Actions by or against public officers who have left office.

When an action has been commenced by or against a public officer of the state in his official capacity and such officer’s successor in office has been substituted as a party pursuant to subsection (d) of Code Section 9-11-25, such action shall proceed as if no change of parties had been made, provided that it shall be within the discretion of the court to allow the successor in office such time as it may deem necessary to appear, plead, or otherwise proceed with such action.

This Code section shall not apply to actions against officers for damages on account of tortious acts committed by such officer under color of office, which actions survive against such officer or his personal representatives, notwithstanding the death, resignation, removal, or expiration of the term of such officer.

This Code section shall relate only to actions commenced by or against state officers in their official capacity and shall not relate or apply to actions commenced by or against municipal, district, or county officers.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 516, §§ 2, 4, 5; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45.

45-1-3.
Display or sale of motor vehicle tag or sign purporting that owner serves on Governor’s staff.

Without the written permission of the Governor, it shall be unlawful to display in any manner upon any motor vehicle a sign, tag, or emblem of any fashion purporting to convey the impression that the owner thereof is a member of the Governor’s staff.

It shall be unlawful to sell or offer to sell any such sign, tag, or emblem.

Any person, firm, or corporation who violates this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1964, p. 198, §§ 1-3.

45-1-4.
Complaints or information from public employees as to fraud, waste, and abuse in state programs and operations.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Government agency” means any agency of federal, state, or local government charged with the enforcement of laws, rules, or regulations.

“Law, rule, or regulation” includes any federal, state, or local statute or ordinance or any rule or regulation adopted according to any federal, state, or local statute or ordinance.

“Public employee” means any person who is employed by the executive, judicial, or legislative branch of the state or by any other department, board, bureau, commission, authority, or other agency of the state. This term also includes all employees, officials, and administrators of any agency covered by the rules of the State Personnel Board and any local or regional governmental entity that receives any funds from the State of Georgia or any state agency.

“Public employer” means the executive, judicial, or legislative branch of the state; any other department, board, bureau, commission, authority, or other agency of the state which employs or appoints a public employee or public employees; or any local or regional governmental entity that receives any funds from the State of Georgia or any state agency.

“Retaliate” or “retaliation” refers to the discharge, suspension, or demotion by a public employer of a public employee or any other adverse employment action taken by a public employer against a public employee in the terms or conditions of employment for disclosing a violation of or noncompliance with a law, rule, or regulation to either a supervisor or government agency.

“Supervisor” means any individual:

To whom a public employer has given authority to direct and control the work performance of the affected public employee;

To whom a public employer has given authority to take corrective action regarding a violation of or noncompliance with a law, rule, or regulation of which the public employee complains; or

Who has been designated by a public employer to receive complaints regarding a violation of or noncompliance with a law, rule, or regulation.

A public employer may receive and investigate complaints or information from any public employee concerning the possible existence of any activity constituting fraud, waste, and abuse in or relating to any state programs and operations under the jurisdiction of such public employer.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, such public employer shall not after receipt of a complaint or information from a public employee disclose the identity of the public employee without the written consent of such public employee, unless the public employer determines such disclosure is necessary and unavoidable during the course of the investigation. In such event, the public employee shall be notified in writing at least seven days prior to such disclosure.

No public employer shall make, adopt, or enforce any policy or practice preventing a public employee from disclosing a violation of or noncompliance with a law, rule, or regulation to either a supervisor or a government agency.

No public employer shall retaliate against a public employee for disclosing a violation of or noncompliance with a law, rule, or regulation to either a supervisor or a government agency, unless the disclosure was made with knowledge that the disclosure was false or with reckless disregard for its truth or falsity.

No public employer shall retaliate against a public employee for objecting to, or refusing to participate in, any activity, policy, or practice of the public employer that the public employee has reasonable cause to believe is in violation of or noncompliance with a law, rule, or regulation.

Paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of this subsection shall not apply to policies or practices which implement, or to actions by public employers against public employees who violate, privilege or confidentiality obligations recognized by constitutional, statutory, or common law.

A public employee who has been the object of retaliation in violation of this Code section may institute a civil action in superior court for relief as set forth in paragraph (2) of this subsection within one year after discovering the retaliation or within three years after the retaliation, whichever is earlier.

In any action brought pursuant to this subsection, the court may order any or all of the following relief:

An injunction restraining continued violation of this Code section;

Reinstatement of the employee to the same position held before the retaliation or to an equivalent position;

Reinstatement of full fringe benefits and seniority rights;

Compensation for lost wages, benefits, and other remuneration; and

Any other compensatory damages allowable at law.

A court may award reasonable attorney’s fees, court costs, and expenses to a prevailing public employee.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-1-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 563, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 899, § 1/HB 665; Ga. L. 2007, p. 298, § 1/HB 16; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-66/HB 642.

Cross references.

Reprisals prohibited against community service board, §

37-2-6

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

Law reviews.

For annual survey of administrative law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 31 (2004).

For annual survey of labor and employment law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 291 (2004).

For survey article on local government law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 285 (2007).

For annual survey on labor and employment law, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 173 (2012).

For annual survey on labor and employment law, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 121 (2014).

For article, “Georgia’s Public Whistleblower Statute,” see 20 Ga. St. Bar J. 8 (April 2015).

For annual survey on labor and employment law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 141 (2017).

For annual survey on local government law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 205 (2017).

For annual survey on labor and employment law, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 125 (2018).

For annual survey on labor and employment law, see 71 Mercer L. Rev. 137 (2019).

For annual survey on local government, see
73 Mercer L. Rev. 193 (2021).

For note on 2007 amendment of this Code section, see 24 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 309 (2007).

45-1-5.
Purging personnel records of terminated employee.

When an employee of the state or of a county, municipality, or school district is terminated and, as a condition of a settlement agreement, the personnel file of the employee is to be partially or totally purged, the former employee’s personnel records, including both the personnel file and any associated work history records, shall be clearly designated with a notation that such records have been purged as a condition of a settlement agreement. Such notation shall be disclosed to any subsequent governmental entity seeking information as to a former employee’s work history for the sole purpose of making a hiring decision.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-1-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 1081, § 1.

45-1-6.
Gifts to employees by vendors; disclosure; reports.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Commission” means the Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Commission created under Code Section 21-5-4.

“Gift” means a gratuity, subscription, membership, trip, meal, loan, extension of credit, forgiveness of debt, advance or deposit of money, or anything of value.

“Person” means an individual, partnership, committee, association, corporation, labor organization, or any other organization or group of persons.

“Public employee” means every person employed by the executive, legislative, or judicial branch of state government or any department, board, bureau, agency, commission, or authority thereof. This shall not include elected officials.

“Vendor” means any person who sells to or contracts with any branch of state government or any department, board, bureau, agency, or commission thereof for the provision of any goods or services.

Any vendor who, either directly or through another person, makes a gift or gifts to one or more public employees exceeding in the aggregate $250.00 in value during any calendar year shall file a disclosure report with the commission in the form specified by the commission listing the amount and date of receipt, the name and mailing address of any vendor making the gift, and the name, address, and position of each public employee receiving such a gift.

Each disclosure report required by subsection (b) of this Code section shall be filed with the commission not later than February 1 of each year and shall cover the preceding calendar year.

A report required by this Code section shall be verified by the oath or affirmation of the person filing such report or statement taken before an officer authorized to administer oaths. Each report required in a calendar year shall contain cumulative totals of all gifts which have been made or received and which are required to be reported.

In addition to other penalties provided under this Code section, a filing fee of $50.00 shall be imposed for each report that is filed late. In addition, a filing fee of $25.00 shall be imposed on the fifteenth day after the due date if the report has still not been filed.

The commission is vested with the same powers with respect to this Code section as enumerated in Code Section 21-5-6.

Venue for prosecution of civil violations of this Code section or for any other action by or on behalf of the commission shall be in the county of residence of the accused person at the time of the alleged violation or action.

Any person who knowingly fails to comply with or knowingly violates this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-1-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 1069, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 26/SB 17.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 1/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Act of 2010.’ ”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 30/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment to this Code section applies to all reports filed on and after January 10, 2011.

Law reviews.

For article, “Georgia’s New Ethics Laws: A Summary of the Changes Relevant to Lobbyists and Legislators,” see 11 Ga. St. B. J. 22 (No. 4, 2005).

45-1-7.
Paid break time and private location for expression of breast milk.

As used in this Code section, the term “agency” means a branch, department, agency, board, bureau, office, commission, public corporation, authority, county, municipal corporation, school district, or other political subdivision of this state.

Each agency shall provide paid break time of a reasonable duration to an employee who desires to express breast milk during work hours at the agency’s worksite. Such break time shall be paid at the employee’s regular rate of compensation. If the employee is paid on a salary basis, the agency shall neither require the salaried employee to use paid leave during any break nor reduce the employee’s salary as a result of the salaried employee taking a break to express breast milk during the workday. No agency shall be required to provide paid break time to an employee on any day that the employee is working away from the agency’s worksite.

Each agency shall provide a room or other location, other than a restroom, in close proximity to the employee’s work area where an employee described in subsection (b) of this Code section can express breast milk in privacy at the agency’s worksite.

No agency shall have liability under this Code section for making reasonable efforts to comply with this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-1-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 818, § 1-2/HB 1090.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective August 5, 2020.

45-1-8.
Payroll deduction for liability insurance protection.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Correctional officer” means any person who is authorized to exercise the power of arrest and who is employed or appointed by the Department of Corrections or the State Board of Pardons and Paroles.

“Emergency health worker” means hospital emergency department personnel and emergency medical services personnel.

“ERISA” means the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, 29 U.S.C. Section 1001, et seq.

“Firefighter” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 25-4-2.

“Highway emergency response operator” means a person employed by the Department of Transportation who operates a towing or recovery vehicle or highway maintenance vehicle.

“Jail officer” means any person who is employed or appointed by a county or municipality and who has the responsibility of supervising inmates confined in a municipal or county detention facility.

“Juvenile correctional officer” means any person employed or appointed by the Department of Juvenile Justice whose primary responsibility is the supervision and control of youth confined in its programs and facilities.

“Probation officer” means a community supervision officer, county or Department of Juvenile Justice juvenile probation officer, or probation officer serving pursuant to Article 6 of Chapter 8 of Title 42.

“Public safety employee” means a peace officer, correctional officer, emergency health worker, firefighter, highway emergency response operator, jail officer, juvenile correctional officer, or probation officer.

The State of Georgia and the governing authority of each county and municipality that currently provides electronic payroll deposits to employees shall also provide payroll deductions to any full-time or part-time public safety employee who requests such a deduction for the purpose of purchasing insurance that provides such public safety employee with legal representation during all civil, administrative, or criminal actions caused as a result of his or her role or responsibilities as a public safety employee. Such deduction shall only be used to pay the premiums on insurance plans that are compliant within current ERISA standards and any dues or fees required by any professional organization that owns and provides such ERISA compliant product as a benefit of membership.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-1-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2021, p. 620, § 3/HB 286.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2021.

Law reviews.

For article, “HB 286: Restricting Local and Municipal Governments’ Ability to Reduce Police Department Funding,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 201 (2021).